Alabama, session 2026rs, SB89.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Article 1 of Chapter 4 of Title 33,
consisting of Sections 33-4-1 through 33-4-14, Code of Alabama
1975, establishing the State Pilotage Commission, and Article
2 of Chapter 4 of Title 33, consisting of Sections 33-4-30
through 33-4-57, Code of Alabama 1975, establishing
requirements for bar pilots in this state, are repealed.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 1

2026.
SB89 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB89
Senate 15-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 29-Jan-26




By: Senator Sessions
Page 2